Nebraska, session 109, LB1173.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1173 LB1173
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-648, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-648 (1) With respect to wages for employment, combined tax shall
accrue and become payable by each employer not otherwise entitled to make
payments in lieu of contributions for each calendar year in which he or
she is subject to the Employment Security Law. Such combined tax shall
become due and be paid by each employer to the commissioner for the
Workforce Development Program Cash Fund and the Unemployment Trust Fund
in such manner and at such times as the commissioner may, by rule and
regulation, prescribe. Such combined tax shall not be deducted, in whole
or in part, from the wages of individuals in such employer's employ.
(2) The commissioner may require any employer whose annual payroll
for either of the two preceding calendar years has equaled or exceeded
one hundred thousand dollars to file combined tax returns and pay
combined taxes owed by an electronic method approved by the commissioner,
except when the employer establishes to the satisfaction of the
commissioner that filing the combined tax return or payment of the tax by
an electronic method would create a hardship for the employer.
(3) In the payment of any combined tax, a fractional part of a cent
shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which
case it shall be increased to one cent. If the combined tax due for any
reporting period is less than five dollars, the employer need not remit
the combined tax.
(4) If two or more related corporations or limited liability
companies concurrently employ the same individual and compensate such
individual through a common paymaster which is one of such corporations
or limited liability companies, each such corporation or limited
liability company shall be considered to have paid as remuneration to
such individual only the amounts actually disbursed by it to such
individual and shall not be considered to have paid as remuneration to
such individual amounts actually disbursed to such individual by another
-2-

LB1173 LB1173
2026 2026
of such corporations or limited liability companies. An employee of a
wholly owned subsidiary shall be considered to be concurrently employed
by the parent corporation, company, or other entity and the wholly owned
subsidiary whether or not both companies separately provide remuneration.
(5) The professional employer organization shall report and pay
combined tax, penalties, and interest owed for wages earned by worksite
employees under the client's employer account number using the client's
combined tax rate. The client is liable for the payment of unpaid
combined tax, penalties, and interest owed for wages paid to worksite
employees, and the worksite employees shall be considered employees of
the client for purposes of the Employment Security Law.
(6) The Commissioner of Labor may require by rule and regulation
that each employer subject to the Employment Security Law shall submit to
the commissioner quarterly wage reports on such forms and in such manner
as the commissioner may prescribe. The commissioner may require by rule
and regulation an annual filing fee for such reports in an amount not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The commissioner shall remit such fees
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor, Business, and
Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund. The
commissioner may require any employer whose annual payroll for either of
the two preceding calendar years has equaled or exceeded one hundred
thousand dollars to file wage reports by an electronic method approved by
the commissioner, except when the employer establishes to the
satisfaction of the commissioner that filing by an electronic method
would create a hardship for the employer. The quarterly wage reports
shall be used by the commissioner to make monetary determinations of
claims for benefits.
Sec. 2. Section 48-1706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1706 Each application shall be accompanied by a fee. The
Commissioner of Labor shall establish the amount of the fee, which shall
-3-

LB1173 LB1173
2026 2026
not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars, by rule and regulation. The fee
shall be established with due regard for the costs of administering the
Farm Labor Contractors Act. All fees so collected shall be deposited in
the Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer Organization
Registration Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 48-2107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-2107 (1) Each application or renewal under section 48-2105 shall
be signed by the applicant and accompanied by a fee not to exceed forty
dollars. The commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to establish the criteria for acceptability of filing documents and
making payments electronically. The criteria may include requirements for
electronic signatures. The commissioner may refuse to accept any
electronic filings or payments that do not meet the criteria established.
The fee shall not be required when an amendment to an application is
submitted. The commissioner shall remit the fees collected under this
subsection to the State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor, Business,
and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.
(2) A contractor shall not be required to pay the fee under
subsection (1) of this section if (a) the contractor is self-employed and
does not pay more than three thousand dollars annually to employ other
persons in the business and the application contains a statement made
under oath or equivalent affirmation setting forth such information or
(b) the contractor only engages in the construction of water wells or
installation of septic systems. At any time that a contractor no longer
qualifies for exemption from the fee, the fee shall be paid to the
department. Any false statement made under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section shall be a violation of section 28-915.01.
Sec. 4. Section 48-2710, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-2710 (1) The department shall adopt a schedule of fees for
-4-

LB1173 LB1173
2026 2026
initial registration, annual registration renewal, and limited
registration, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for initial
registration, one thousand five hundred dollars for annual registration
renewal, and one thousand dollars for limited registration. Such fees
shall not exceed those reasonably necessary for the administration of the
Professional Employer Organization Registration Act.
(2) Fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor, Business, and Professional
Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.
Sec. 5. Section 81-406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-406 (1) The Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer
Organization Registration Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the Department of Labor and shall consist of fees
collected by the department pursuant to the Farm Labor Contractors Act,
the Contractor Registration Act, and the Professional Employer
Organization Registration Act and section 48-648 and such sums as are
appropriated to the fund by the Legislature.
(2) The fund shall be used for:
(a) Enforcing enforcing and administering:
(i) The Employment Security Law;
(ii) The the Farm Labor Contractors Act;
(iii) The , the Contractor Registration Act;
(iv) The , the Employee Classification Act;
(v) The , and the Professional Employer Organization Registration
Act; .
(vi) The Non-English-Speaking Workers Protection Act;
(vii) The Wage and Hour Act;
(viii) The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act;
(ix) The Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act;
(x) The child labor provisions found in sections 48-302 to 48-313;
-5-

LB1173 LB1173
2026 2026
(xi) The veterans preference provisions found in sections 48-225 to
48-231 and section 48-238;
(xii) The military employment provisions found in sections 55-160 to
55-166; and
(xiii) The onsite safety and health consultation program provided to
private sector employers under 29 C.F.R. part 1908;
(b) Any other purposes related to the proper administration of
programs under the Department of Labor, as determined by the Commissioner
of Labor; and
(c) Workforce development grants to be used in accordance with
subsection (2) of section 81-407. No transfer from the Contractor,
Business, and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund
shall be made to the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund for this
purpose except on written authorization by the Governor at the request of
the Commissioner of Labor.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Money in the
Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer Organization Registration
Cash Fund may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature.
The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
thousand dollars from the Contractor and Professional Employer
Organization Registration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
15, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 6. Original sections 48-1706, 48-2710, and 81-406, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 48-2107, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 48-648, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-6-